New Jersey, session 221, A3923.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an employer at a construction site shall provide a minimum of one separate toilet facility for each 20 employees or fraction thereof of each gender.  The facilities may include both toilets and urinals provided that the number of toilets shall not be less than one half of the minimum required number of facilities.  The only exception to the number of toilets required by this subsection is where there are four or fewer employees at a construction site, one single-user toilet facility designated for all-gender use is sufficient.  Each single-user toilet facility designated for all-gender use counts as one of the required separate toilet facilities if all of the following conditions are met: (1)   the total number of toilet facilities provided is in accordance with this subsection; (2)   all single-user toilet facilities are designated for all-gender use; and (3)   all multi-user separate toilet facilities are provided in equal number to each sex. b.    Under temporary field conditions, the employer shall provide at least one toilet. c.     Where the provision of water closets is not feasible due to the absence of a sanitary sewer or the lack of an adequate water supply, nonwater carriage disposal facilities shall be provided.  Unless prohibited by applicable local regulations, these facilities may include privies, chemical toilets, recirculating toilets, or combustion toilets. d.    Toilet facilities shall be kept clean, maintained in good working order, designed and maintained in a manner that will assure privacy, and provided with an adequate supply of toilet paper. Where sinks for washing hands are feasible, the employer shall provide adequate soap and water for handwashing. e.     Where sinks for washing hands are not feasible due to the absence of a sanitary sewer or the lack of an adequate water supply, the employer shall provide hand sanitizer for each toilet. f.     If work hours fall outside of daylight hours, the employer shall maintain toilet facilities in an open area that is well illuminated. g.    The requirements of this section shall not apply to mobile crews having readily available transportation to nearby toilet facilities. h.    The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of the standards prescribed in this section and enforce any violations of the standards. i.     As used in this act: Employer means a body, board, person, corporation, partnership, proprietorship, joint venture, fund, authority or similar entity employing, permitting or suffering another to work. In the case of a corporation, the officers of the corporation and any agents having the management of the corporation shall be deemed to be employers of the employees of the corporation for the purposes of this act.  This term shall apply to private employers and to the State, its political subdivisions, and any boards, commissions, schools, institutions, or authorities created or recognized thereby. 2.    a.  The Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall, within one year of the effective date of this act, submit a proposed State OSH plan addressing the occupational safety and health issue of Toilets at Construction Jobsites pursuant to section 1 of this act to the United States Department of Labor for approval as a state OSH plan that would, if approved, preempt federal standards.  The proposed State OSH plan shall meets all requirements for state OSH plans under subsection (c) of 29 U.S.C. s.667, and any other applicable federal standards. b.    If the United States Department of Labor rejects the proposed plan submitted pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall take all necessary steps to rectify deficiencies in the plan and resubmit the updated plan to the United States Department of Labor. 3.    Section 2 of this act shall take effect immediately, and section 1 of this act shall take effect upon the United States Department of Labors approval of the State OSH plan concerning standards provided for that section.